Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2,243
Department, defined.

Department shall mean the Department of Agriculture.

Laws 1981, LB 487, § 12;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 81-216.08;

Laws 1991, LB 358, § 12.